District of Columbia statutes.
22-2708

Causing spouse or domestic partner to live in prostitution.

Any person who by force, fraud, intimidation, or threats, places or leaves, or procures any other person or persons to place or leave, a spouse or domestic partner in a house of prostitution, or to lead a life of prostitution, shall be guilty of a felony, and upon conviction thereof shall be imprisoned not less than one year nor more than 10 years. In addition to any other penalty provided under this section, a person may be fined an amount not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01.

June 25, 1910, 36 Stat. 833, ch. 404, § 4
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119,§ 12(d), 41 DCR 1639
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 6, 44 DCR 1408
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-306, § 214(d), 53 DCR 8610
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 306(a), 60 DCR 2064
Armed offenses, additional penalty for committing a crime when armed, see §§ 22-4501 and 22-4502.
This section is referenced in § 14-311 and § 23-113.
1981 Ed., § 22-2708.
1973 Ed., § 22-2708.
D.C. Law 16-306 substituted “spouse or domestic partner” for “spouse”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 added the last sentence.
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-445, July 19, 2006, 53 DCR 6443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-490, October 18, 2006, 53 DCR 8686).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-10, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1479).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 214(d) of Omnibus Public Safety Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-25, April 19, 2007, 54 DCR 4036).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 306(a) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.